etc/dictionaries/fr-toutesvariantes.aff
FLAG long
SFX iA Y 19
SFX iA dvenir dvenir/135 venir 54
SFX iA dvenir dvenant/58 venir 41
SFX iA dvenir dvenu/75 venir 73
SFX iA dvenir dvenus/75 venir 72
SFX iA dvenir dvenue/75 venir 69
SFX iA dvenir dvenues/75 venir 70
SFX iA dvenir dvient/58 venir 71
SFX iA dvenir dviennent/20 venir 35
SFX iA dvenir dvenait/58 venir 43
SFX iA dvenir dvenaient/20 venir 44
SFX iA dvenir dvint/58 venir 55
SFX iA dvenir dvinrent/20 venir 62
SFX iA dvenir dviendra/58 venir 23
SFX iA dvenir dviendront/20 venir 26
SFX iA dvenir dviendrait/58 venir 24
SFX iA dvenir dviendraient/20 venir 25
SFX iA dvenir dvienne/58 venir 111
SFX iA dvenir dvînt/58 venir 45
SFX iA dvenir dvinssent/20 venir 52

SFX iB Y 40
SFX iB partenir partenir/93 tenir 54
SFX iB partenir partenant/21 tenir 41
SFX iB partenir partenu/65 tenir 106
SFX iB partenir partiens/31 tenir 77
SFX iB partenir partient/21 tenir 71
SFX iB partenir partenons/29 tenir 46
SFX iB partenir partenez/26 tenir 61
SFX iB partenir partiennent/21 tenir 35
SFX iB partenir partenais/31 tenir 53
SFX iB partenir partenait/21 tenir 43
SFX iB partenir partenions/29 tenir 66
SFX iB partenir parteniez/26 tenir 65
SFX iB partenir partenaient/21 tenir 44
SFX iB partenir partins/31 tenir 79
SFX iB partenir partint/21 tenir 55
SFX iB partenir partînmes/29 tenir 49
SFX iB partenir partîntes/26 tenir 48
SFX iB partenir partinrent/21 tenir 62
SFX iB partenir partiendrai/31 tenir 33
SFX iB partenir partiendras/34 tenir 32
SFX iB partenir partiendra/21 tenir 23
SFX iB partenir partiendrons/29 tenir 28
SFX iB partenir partiendrez/26 tenir 27
SFX iB partenir partiendront/21 tenir 26
SFX iB partenir partiendrais/31 tenir 34
SFX iB partenir partiendrait/21 tenir 24
SFX iB partenir partiendrions/29 tenir 30
SFX iB partenir partiendriez/26 tenir 29
SFX iB partenir partiendraient/21 tenir 25
SFX iB partenir partienne/55 tenir 76
SFX iB partenir partiennes/34 tenir 75
SFX iB partenir partinsse/31 tenir 59
SFX iB partenir partinsses/34 tenir 58
SFX iB partenir partînt/21 tenir 45
SFX iB partenir partinssions/29 tenir 57
SFX iB partenir partinssiez/26 tenir 56
SFX iB partenir partinssent/21 tenir 52
SFX iB partenir partiens/34 tenir 31
SFX iB partenir partenons/15 tenir 47
SFX iB partenir partenez/26 tenir 63

SFX iC Y 41
SFX iC rir rir/54 [vf]rir 54
SFX iC rir rant/8 [vf]rir 41
SFX iC rir ert/6 [vf]rir 73
SFX iC rir erts/9 [vf]rir 72
SFX iC rir erte/6 [vf]rir 69
SFX iC rir ertes/9 [vf]rir 70
SFX iC rir re/33 [vf]rir 39
SFX iC rir res/24 [vf]rir 208
SFX iC rir rons/16 [vf]rir 46
SFX iC rir rez/13 [vf]rir 61
SFX iC rir rent/8 [vf]rir 35
SFX iC rir rais/19 [vf]rir 53
SFX iC rir rait/8 [vf]rir 43
SFX iC rir rions/16 [vf]rir 66
SFX iC rir riez/13 [vf]rir 65
SFX iC rir raient/8 [vf]rir 44
SFX iC rir ris/19 [vf]rir 79
SFX iC rir rit/8 [vf]rir 55
SFX iC rir rîmes/16 [vf]rir 49
SFX iC rir rîtes/13 [vf]rir 48
SFX iC rir rirent/8 [vf]rir 62
SFX iC rir rirai/19 [vf]rir 33
SFX iC rir riras/24 [vf]rir 32
SFX iC rir rira/8 [vf]rir 23
SFX iC rir rirons/16 [vf]rir 28
SFX iC rir rirez/13 [vf]rir 27
SFX iC rir riront/8 [vf]rir 26
SFX iC rir rirais/19 [vf]rir 34
SFX iC rir rirait/8 [vf]rir 24
SFX iC rir ririons/16 [vf]rir 30
SFX iC rir ririez/13 [vf]rir 29
SFX iC rir riraient/8 [vf]rir 25
SFX iC rir risse/19 [vf]rir 59
SFX iC rir risses/24 [vf]rir 58
SFX iC rir rît/8 [vf]rir 45
SFX iC rir rissions/16 [vf]rir 57
SFX iC rir rissiez/13 [vf]rir 56
SFX iC rir rissent/8 [vf]rir 52
SFX iC rir re/41 [vf]rir 31
SFX iC rir rons/48 [vf]rir 47
SFX iC rir rez/36 [vf]rir 63

SFX iD Y 43
SFX iD courir courir/82 courir 54
SFX iD courir courant/20 courir 41
SFX iD courir couru courir 73
SFX iD courir courus courir 72
SFX iD courir courue courir 69
SFX iD courir courues courir 70
SFX iD courir cours/30 courir 77
SFX iD courir court/15 courir 71
SFX iD courir courons/15 courir 46
SFX iD courir courez/15 courir 61
SFX iD courir courent/15 courir 35
SFX iD courir courais/30 courir 53
SFX iD courir courait/15 courir 43
SFX iD courir courions/15 courir 66
SFX iD courir couriez/15 courir 65
SFX iD courir couraient/15 courir 44
SFX iD courir courus/30 courir 79
SFX iD courir courut/15 courir 55
SFX iD courir courûmes/15 courir 49
SFX iD courir courûtes/15 courir 48
SFX iD courir coururent/15 courir 62
SFX iD courir courrai/30 courir 33
SFX iD courir courras/15 courir 32
SFX iD courir courra/15 courir 23
SFX iD courir courrons/15 courir 28
SFX iD courir courrez/15 courir 27
SFX iD courir courront/15 courir 26
SFX iD courir courrais/30 courir 34
SFX iD courir courrait/15 courir 24
SFX iD courir courrions/15 courir 30
SFX iD courir courriez/15 courir 29
SFX iD courir courraient/15 courir 25
SFX iD courir coure/30 courir 76
SFX iD courir coures/15 courir 75
SFX iD courir courusse/30 courir 59
SFX iD courir courusses/15 courir 58
SFX iD courir courût/15 courir 45
SFX iD courir courussions/15 courir 57
SFX iD courir courussiez/15 courir 56
SFX iD courir courussent/15 courir 52
SFX iD courir cours/15 courir 31
SFX iD courir courons/15 courir 47
SFX iD courir courez/15 courir 63

SFX iE Y 43
SFX iE ourir ourir/54 courir 54
SFX iE ourir ourant/21 courir 41
SFX iE ourir ouru/6 courir 73
SFX iE ourir ourus/9 courir 72
SFX iE ourir ourue/6 courir 69
SFX iE ourir ourues/9 courir 70
SFX iE ourir ours/19 courir 77
SFX iE ourir ourt/63 courir 71
SFX iE ourir ourons/39 courir 46
SFX iE ourir ourez/39 courir 61
SFX iE ourir ourent/63 courir 35
SFX iE ourir ourais/19 courir 53
SFX iE ourir ourait/63 courir 43
SFX iE ourir ourions/39 courir 66
SFX iE ourir ouriez/39 courir 65
SFX iE ourir ouraient/63 courir 44
SFX iE ourir ourus/19 courir 79
SFX iE ourir ourut/63 courir 55
SFX iE ourir ourûmes/39 courir 49
SFX iE ourir ourûtes/39 courir 48
SFX iE ourir oururent/63 courir 62
SFX iE ourir ourrai/104 courir 33
SFX iE ourir ourras/16 courir 32
SFX iE ourir ourra/63 courir 23
SFX iE ourir ourrons/39 courir 28
SFX iE ourir ourrez/39 courir 27
SFX iE ourir ourront/63 courir 26
SFX iE ourir ourrais/19 courir 34
SFX iE ourir ourrait/63 courir 24
SFX iE ourir ourrions/39 courir 30
SFX iE ourir ourriez/39 courir 29
SFX iE ourir ourraient/63 courir 25
SFX iE ourir oure/134 courir 76
SFX iE ourir oures/137 courir 75
SFX iE ourir ourusse/104 courir 59
SFX iE ourir ourusses/16 courir 58
SFX iE ourir ourût/63 courir 45
SFX iE ourir ourussions/39 courir 57
SFX iE ourir ourussiez/39 courir 56
SFX iE ourir ourussent/63 courir 52
SFX iE ourir ours/48 courir 31
SFX iE ourir ourons/48 courir 47
SFX iE ourir ourez/48 courir 63

SFX iF N 43
SFX iF ervir ervir servir 54
SFX iF ervir ervant servir 41
SFX iF ervir ervi servir 73
SFX iF ervir ervis servir 72
SFX iF ervir ervie servir 69
SFX iF ervir ervies servir 70
SFX iF ervir ers servir 77
SFX iF ervir ert servir 71
SFX iF ervir ervons servir 46
SFX iF ervir ervez servir 61
SFX iF ervir ervent servir 35
SFX iF ervir ervais servir 53
SFX iF ervir ervait servir 43
SFX iF ervir ervions servir 66
SFX iF ervir erviez servir 65
SFX iF ervir ervaient servir 44
SFX iF ervir ervis servir 79
SFX iF ervir ervit servir 55
SFX iF ervir ervîmes servir 49
SFX iF ervir ervîtes servir 48
SFX iF ervir ervirent servir 62
SFX iF ervir ervirai servir 33
SFX iF ervir erviras servir 32
SFX iF ervir ervira servir 23
SFX iF ervir ervirons servir 28
SFX iF ervir ervirez servir 27
SFX iF ervir erviront servir 26
SFX iF ervir ervirais servir 34
SFX iF ervir ervirait servir 24
SFX iF ervir ervirions servir 30
SFX iF ervir erviriez servir 29
SFX iF ervir erviraient servir 25
SFX iF ervir erve servir 76
SFX iF ervir erves servir 75
SFX iF ervir ervisse servir 59
SFX iF ervir ervisses servir 58
SFX iF ervir ervît servir 45
SFX iF ervir ervissions servir 57
SFX iF ervir ervissiez servir 56
SFX iF ervir ervissent servir 52
SFX iF ervir ers servir 31
SFX iF ervir ervons servir 47
SFX iF ervir ervez servir 63

SFX iG N 43
SFX iG êtir êtir vêtir 54
SFX iG êtir êtant vêtir 41
SFX iG êtir êtu vêtir 73
SFX iG êtir êtus vêtir 72
SFX iG êtir êtue vêtir 69
SFX iG êtir êtues vêtir 70
SFX iG êtir êts vêtir 77
SFX iG êtir êt vêtir 71
SFX iG êtir êtons vêtir 46
SFX iG êtir êtez vêtir 61
SFX iG êtir êtent vêtir 35
SFX iG êtir êtais vêtir 53
SFX iG êtir êtait vêtir 43
SFX iG êtir êtions vêtir 66
SFX iG êtir êtiez vêtir 65
SFX iG êtir êtaient vêtir 44
SFX iG êtir êtis vêtir 79
SFX iG êtir êtit vêtir 55
SFX iG êtir êtîmes vêtir 49
SFX iG êtir êtîtes vêtir 48
SFX iG êtir êtirent vêtir 62
SFX iG êtir êtirai vêtir 33
SFX iG êtir êtiras vêtir 32
SFX iG êtir êtira vêtir 23
SFX iG êtir êtirons vêtir 28
SFX iG êtir êtirez vêtir 27
SFX iG êtir êtiront vêtir 26
SFX iG êtir êtirais vêtir 34
SFX iG êtir êtirait vêtir 24
SFX iG êtir êtirions vêtir 30
SFX iG êtir êtiriez vêtir 29
SFX iG êtir êtiraient vêtir 25
SFX iG êtir ête vêtir 76
SFX iG êtir êtes vêtir 75
SFX iG êtir êtisse vêtir 59
SFX iG êtir êtisses vêtir 58
SFX iG êtir êtît vêtir 45
SFX iG êtir êtissions vêtir 57
SFX iG êtir êtissiez vêtir 56
SFX iG êtir êtissent vêtir 52
SFX iG êtir êts vêtir 31
SFX iG êtir êtons vêtir 47
SFX iG êtir êtez vêtir 63

SFX iI N 40
SFX iI ormir ormir dormir 54
SFX iI ormir ormant dormir 41
SFX iI ormir ormi dormir 106
SFX iI ormir ors dormir 77
SFX iI ormir ort dormir 71
SFX iI ormir ormons dormir 46
SFX iI ormir ormez dormir 61
SFX iI ormir orment dormir 35
SFX iI ormir ormais dormir 53
SFX iI ormir ormait dormir 43
SFX iI ormir ormions dormir 66
SFX iI ormir ormiez dormir 65
SFX iI ormir ormaient dormir 44
SFX iI ormir ormis dormir 79
SFX iI ormir ormit dormir 55
SFX iI ormir ormîmes dormir 49
SFX iI ormir ormîtes dormir 48
SFX iI ormir ormirent dormir 62
SFX iI ormir ormirai dormir 33
SFX iI ormir ormiras dormir 32
SFX iI ormir ormira dormir 23
SFX iI ormir ormirons dormir 28
SFX iI ormir ormirez dormir 27
SFX iI ormir ormiront dormir 26
SFX iI ormir ormirais dormir 34
SFX iI ormir ormirait dormir 24
SFX iI ormir ormirions dormir 30
SFX iI ormir ormiriez dormir 29
SFX iI ormir ormiraient dormir 25
SFX iI ormir orme dormir 76
SFX iI ormir ormes dormir 75
SFX iI ormir ormisse dormir 59
SFX iI ormir ormisses dormir 58
SFX iI ormir ormît dormir 45
SFX iI ormir ormissions dormir 57
SFX iI ormir ormissiez dormir 56
SFX iI ormir ormissent dormir 52
SFX iI ormir ors dormir 31
SFX iI ormir ormons dormir 47
SFX iI ormir ormez dormir 63

SFX iJ Y 43
SFX iJ dormir dormir/54 dormir 54
SFX iJ dormir dormant/8 dormir 41
SFX iJ dormir dormi/6 dormir 73
SFX iJ dormir dormis/9 dormir 72
SFX iJ dormir dormie/6 dormir 69
SFX iJ dormir dormies/9 dormir 70
SFX iJ dormir dors/19 dormir 77
SFX iJ dormir dort/8 dormir 71
SFX iJ dormir dormons/16 dormir 46
SFX iJ dormir dormez/13 dormir 61
SFX iJ dormir dorment/8 dormir 35
SFX iJ dormir dormais/19 dormir 53
SFX iJ dormir dormait/8 dormir 43
SFX iJ dormir dormions/16 dormir 66
SFX iJ dormir dormiez/13 dormir 65
SFX iJ dormir dormaient/8 dormir 44
SFX iJ dormir dormis/19 dormir 79
SFX iJ dormir dormit/8 dormir 55
SFX iJ dormir dormîmes/16 dormir 49
SFX iJ dormir dormîtes/13 dormir 48
SFX iJ dormir dormirent/8 dormir 62
SFX iJ dormir dormirai/19 dormir 33
SFX iJ dormir dormiras/24 dormir 32
SFX iJ dormir dormira/8 dormir 23
SFX iJ dormir dormirons/16 dormir 28
SFX iJ dormir dormirez/13 dormir 27
SFX iJ dormir dormiront/8 dormir 26
SFX iJ dormir dormirais/19 dormir 34
SFX iJ dormir dormirait/8 dormir 24
SFX iJ dormir dormirions/16 dormir 30
SFX iJ dormir dormiriez/13 dormir 29
SFX iJ dormir dormiraient/8 dormir 25
SFX iJ dormir dorme/33 dormir 76
SFX iJ dormir dormes/41 dormir 75
SFX iJ dormir dormisse/19 dormir 59
SFX iJ dormir dormisses/24 dormir 58
SFX iJ dormir dormît/8 dormir 45
SFX iJ dormir dormissions/16 dormir 57
SFX iJ dormir dormissiez/13 dormir 56
SFX iJ dormir dormissent/8 dormir 52
SFX iJ dormir dors/41 dormir 31
SFX iJ dormir dormons/48 dormir 47
SFX iJ dormir dormez/36 dormir 63
